fr: Type de réservoir de la caravane: Réservoir d’eaux noires; Réservoir de toilette à cassette; Réservoir d’eau douce; Réservoir d’eaux grises; Sans réservoir de rétention; Autre
en: Travel trailer holding tank type: Black water tank; Cassette toilet tank; Fresh water tank; Gray water tank; No holding tanks; Other
nb: Type oppsamlingstank for campingvogn: Septiktank; Kassett-toalettank; Ferskvannstank; Gråvannstank; Ingen oppsamlingstanker; Annet
nl: Reistrailer afvaltanktype: Zwartwatertank; Cassettetoilettank; Schoonwatertank; Grijswatertank; Geen opslagtanks; Overig
vi: Loại bể chứa cho xe kéo du lịch: Bể chứa nước đen; Bể chứa bồn cầu dạng khay cassette; Bể chứa nước ngọt; Bể chứa nước xám; Không có bể chứa; Khác
de: Art des Abwassertanks im Wohnwagen: Schwarzwassertank; Kassettentoilettentank; Frischwassertank; Grauwassertank; Keine Auffangtanks; Sonstige
da: Type af holdingtank i rejsetrailer: Tank til sortvand; Tank til kassettetoilet; Ferskvandstank; Gråvandstank; Ingen spildevandstanke; Andet
it: Serbatoio di raccolta per roulotte: Serbatoio acque nere; Serbatoio WC a cassetta; Serbatoio acqua dolce; Serbatoio acque grigie; Nessun serbatoio di raccolta; Altro
cs: Typ sběrné nádrže v obytném přívěsu: Nádrž na černou vodu; Nádrž kazetové toalety; Nádrž na pitnou vodu; Nádrž na šedou vodu; Bez sběrných nádrží; Jiné
ru: Тип накопительных баков туристического прицепа: Бак для черной воды (отходов); Кассетный бак для туалета; Бак для чистой воды; Бак для серой воды; Без баков; Другое
el: Τύπος δεξαμενών αποθήκευσης στο τροχόσπιτο ταξιδιού: Δεξαμενή μαύρων νερών; Δεξαμενή κασετίνας τουαλέτας; Δεξαμενή καθαρού νερού; Δεξαμενή γκρίζων νερών; Χωρίς δεξαμενές συγκράτησης; Άλλο
zh-CN: 旅行拖车储水箱类型: 黑水箱; 盒式马桶水箱; 净水箱; 灰水箱; 无储水箱; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul rezervorului de colectare al rulotei: Rezervor pentru apă neagră; Rezervor de toaletă tip casetă; Rezervor pentru apă curată; Rezervor pentru apă gri; Fără rezervoare de stocare; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta spremnika za putničku prikolicu: Spremnik za crnu vodu; Kasetni spremnik toaleta; Spremnik za svježu vodu; Spremnik za sivu vodu; Bez spremnika za zadržavanje; Ostalo
hu: Lakókocsi szennyvíz- és víztartály típusa: Feketevíz-tartály; Kazettás WC-tartály; Frissvíz-tartály; Szürkevíz-tartály; Nincsenek gyűjtőtartályok; Egyéb
ko: 캠핑 트레일러 오수 탱크 유형: 블랙 워터 탱크; 카세트 화장실 탱크; 정수 탱크; 그레이 워터 탱크; 홀딩 탱크 없음; 기타
pt-BR: Trailer de viagem tipo de tanque de retenção: Tanque de águas negras; Tanque de vaso sanitário químico (cassete); Tanque de água potável; Tanque de águas cinzas; Sem tanques de retenção; Outro
th: ถังเก็บน้ำเสียแบบรถพ่วงสำหรับเดินทาง: ถังเก็บสิ่งปฏิกูล; ถังส้วมแบบถอดได้; ถังน้ำจืด; ถังเก็บน้ำทิ้งทั่วไป; ไม่มีถังเก็บน้ำ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de depósito de retenção da caravana de viagem: Depósito de águas negras; Depósito de sanita de cassete; Depósito de água doce; Depósito de águas cinzentas; Sem depósitos de retenção; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta zadrževalnega rezervoarja bivalne prikolice: Rezervoar za črno vodo; Rezervoar kasetnega stranišča; Rezervoar za svežo vodo; Rezervoar za sivo vodo; Brez rezervoarjev; Drugo
zh-TW: 旅行拖車廢水箱類型: 黑水箱; 便攜式馬桶水箱; 清水箱; 灰水箱; 無儲水箱; 其他
tr: Karavan atık su tankı tipi: Siyah su tankı; Kasetli tuvalet tankı; Temiz su tankı; Gri su tankı; Tutma tankı yok; Diğer
lt-LT: Kelioninės priekabos bako tipas: Juodojo vandens bakas; Kasetinio tualeto bakas; Švaraus vandens bakas; Pilkojo vandens bakas; Be rezervuarų; Kita
es: Tipo de tanque de retención para remolques de viaje: Tanque de aguas negras; Tanque de inodoro de casete; Tanque de agua dulce; Tanque de aguas grises; Sin tanques de retención; Otro
fi: Matkailuvaunun säiliön tyyppi: Jätevesisäiliö (mustavesi); Kasettikäymälän säiliö; Puhdasvesisäiliö; Harmaavesisäiliö; Ei jätesäiliöitä; Muu
sv: Typ av septiktank för husvagn: Svartvattentank; Kassettank till toalett; Färskvattentank; Gråvattentank; Inga tankar; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ nádrže na obytný príves: Nádrž na čiernu vodu; Nádrž kazetovej toalety; Nádrž na čistú vodu; Nádrž na sivú vodu; Bez zberných nádrží; Iné
bg-BG: Тип на резервоара в туристическо ремарке: Резервоар за черна вода; Резервоар за касетна тоалетна; Резервоар за чиста вода; Резервоар за сива вода; Без резервоари за задържане; Друго
ja: トラベルトレーラー貯蔵タンクタイプ: ブラックウォータータンク; カセットトイレタンク; フレッシュウォータータンク; グレーウォータータンク; ホールディングタンクなし; その他
pl: Typ zbiornika przyczepy kempingowej: Zbiornik na czarną wodę; Kaseta toaletowa (zbiornik); Zbiornik na czystą wodę; Zbiornik na szarą wodę; Brak zbiorników; Inne